Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-6,296
Motor vehicles; trailers; overloading; violation; penalty.

(1) Any person operating any motor vehicle, semitrailer, or trailer, when the weight of the vehicle and load is in violation of the provisions of section 60-6,294 and the vehicle and load do not qualify for the exceptions permitted by section 60-6,301, shall be guilty of a traffic infraction and shall, upon conviction thereof, be fined:

(a) Twenty-five dollars for carrying a gross load of five percent or less over the maximum;

(b) One hundred dollars for carrying a gross load of more than five percent but not more than ten percent over the maximum;

(c) Two hundred dollars for carrying a gross load of more than ten percent but not more than fifteen percent over the maximum;

(d) Three hundred fifty dollars for carrying a gross load of more than fifteen percent but not more than twenty percent over the maximum;

(e) Six hundred dollars for carrying a gross load of more than twenty percent but not more than twenty-five percent over the maximum;

(f) One thousand dollars for carrying a gross load of more than twenty-five percent over the maximum;

(g) Twenty-five dollars for carrying a load on a single axle or a group of axles of five percent or less over the maximum;

(h) Seventy-five dollars for carrying a load on a single axle or a group of axles of more than five percent but not more than ten percent over the maximum;

(i) One hundred fifty dollars for carrying a load on a single axle or a group of axles of more than ten percent but not more than fifteen percent over the maximum;

(j) Three hundred twenty-five dollars for carrying a load on a single axle or a group of axles of more than fifteen percent but not more than twenty percent over the maximum;

(k) Five hundred dollars for carrying a load on a single axle or a group of axles of more than twenty percent but not more than twenty-five percent over the maximum;

(l) Seven hundred fifty dollars for carrying a load on a single axle or group of axles of more than twenty-five percent but not more than thirty percent over the maximum;

(m) Nine hundred fifty dollars for carrying a load on a single axle or group of axles of more than thirty percent but not more than thirty-five percent over the maximum;

(n) One thousand one hundred fifty dollars for carrying a load on a single axle or group of axles of more than thirty-five percent but not more than forty percent over the maximum;

(o) Fifteen hundred fifty dollars for carrying a load on a single axle or group of axles of more than forty percent but not more than forty-five percent over the maximum;

(p) Two thousand dollars for carrying a load on a single axle or group of axles of more than forty-five percent but not more than fifty percent over the maximum; and

(q) Twenty-five hundred dollars for carrying a load on a single axle or group of axles of more than fifty percent over the maximum.

(2) No person shall be guilty of multiple offenses when the violations (a) involve the excess weight of an axle or a group of axles and the excess weight of the gross load of a single vehicle or (b) occur on the National System of Interstate and Defense Highways.

Laws 1953, c. 134, § 4, p. 420;

Laws 1963, c. 226, § 2, p. 710;

Laws 1969, c. 318, § 3, p. 1155;

Laws 1973, LB 491, § 4;

R.S.Supp.,1973, § 39-723.06;

Laws 1974, LB 920, § 4;

Laws 1977, LB 41, § 33;

Laws 1979, LB 112, § 2;

Laws 1984, LB 726, § 5;

Laws 1985, LB 553, § 7;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 39-6,184;

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 392.

Complaints filed were within jurisdiction of the justice court. Conkling v. DeLany, 167 Neb. 4, 91 N.W.2d 250 (1958).